District of Columbia statutes.
32-1523

Appearance of Attorney General for the District of Columbia for Mayor.

In any court proceedings instituted under the provisions of this chapter, the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia shall appear as attorney or counsel on behalf of the Mayor whether the Mayor is a party to the case or interested, and shall represent the Mayor in any court in which such case may be carried on appeal.

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 24, 27 DCR 2503
1981 Ed., § 36-323.